Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.210

Power to act as trustee—Authorized trusts—Limitations—Application to act as trustee, fee—Approval or refusal of application—Right of appeal—Use of word "trust."

(1) A savings bank has the powers and authorities to engage in trust business that a state commercial bank authorized under RCW 30A.08.150 and subject also to the requirements and conditions for engaging in trust business set forth in this section.

(2) A mutual savings bank shall have the power to act as trustee under:

(a) A trust established by an inter vivos trust agreement or under the will of a deceased person.

(b) A trust established in connection with any collective bargaining agreement or labor negotiation wherein the beneficiaries of the trust include the employees concerned under the agreement or negotiation, or a trust established in connection with any pension, profit sharing, or retirement benefit plan of any corporation, partnership, association, or individual, including but not limited to retirement plans established pursuant to the provisions of the act of congress entitled "Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Act of 1962", as now constituted or hereafter amended, or plans established pursuant to the provisions of the act of congress entitled "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974", as now constituted or hereafter amended.

(3) A mutual savings bank may be appointed to and accept the appointment of personal representative of the last will and testament, or administrator with will annexed, of the estate of any deceased person and to be appointed and to act as guardian of the estate of minors, incompetent persons, and persons with a disability.

(4) The restrictions, limitations and requirements in Title 30A RCW shall apply to a mutual savings bank exercising the powers granted under this section insofar as the restrictions, limitations, and requirements relate to exercising the powers granted under this section. The incidental trust powers to act as agent in the management of trust property and the transaction of trust business in Title 30A RCW shall apply to a mutual savings bank exercising the powers granted under this section insofar as the incidental powers relate to exercising the powers granted under this section.

(5) Before engaging in trust business, a mutual savings bank shall apply to the director on such form as he or she shall determine and pay the same fee as required for a state bank to engage in trust business. In considering such application the director shall ascertain from the best source of information at his or her command and by such investigation as he or she may deem necessary whether the management and personnel of the mutual savings bank are such as to command confidence and warrant belief that the trust business will be adequately and efficiently conducted in accordance with law, whether the resources in the neighborhood of such place and in the surrounding country afford a reasonable promise of adequate support for the proposed trust business and whether the resources of the mutual savings bank are sufficient to support the conduct of such trust business, and that the mutual savings bank has and maintains, in addition to its guaranty fund, undivided profits against which the depositors have no prior claim in an amount not less than would be required of a state bank or trust company, which undivided profits shall be eligible for investment in the same manner as the guaranty fund of a mutual savings bank. Within sixty days after receipt of such application, the director shall either approve or refuse the same and forthwith return to the mutual savings bank a copy of the application upon which his or her decision has been endorsed. The director shall not be required to approve or refuse an application until thirty days after any appropriate approval has been obtained from a federal regulatory agency. The applicant shall have the right to appeal from an unfavorable determination in accordance with the procedures of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended. A mutual savings bank shall not use the word "trust" in its name, but may use the word "trust" in its business or advertising.

[ 2014 c 37 s 502; 1994 c 92 s 320; 1975 1st ex.s. c 265 s 1; 1969 c 55 s 12.]

NOTES:

Legislative declarations—Effective date—2014 c 37: See RCW 30A.04.005 and 30A.04.902.